Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-232.03
Limited period bingo; authorization.

A licensed organization may request authorization from the department to conduct a limited period bingo. A licensed organization may conduct no more than four limited period bingos with an aggregate total of no more than twelve days in any twelve-month period commencing October 1 of each year or such other date as the department may prescribe by rule and regulation.

The request shall be in writing and shall contain the date and time when and the location where the limited period bingo is to be conducted. The request shall be submitted to the department at least ten days prior to the desired starting date of the limited period bingo.

Except as otherwise provided in the Nebraska Bingo Act, a limited period bingo shall be conducted in the same manner as prescribed for regular bingo occasions.

Laws 1994, LB 694, § 36;

Laws 2000, LB 1086, § 6.